hu_hu.affix
SFX G 0 ebbét/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbéről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbére/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbénél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbének/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbén/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbéig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbéhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbéből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbében/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbébe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbtől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbre/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbnél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbnek/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbként/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéévé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéével/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéétől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéét/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéére/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéénél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéének/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéén/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééiül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééiért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééivé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééivel/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééitől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééit/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééiről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééire/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééinél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééinek/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééin/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééiig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééihez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééiből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééiben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééibe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééi [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjééből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéében/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéébe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjévé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjével/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjétől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjét/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjére/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjénél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjének/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjén/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjéből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjében/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjébe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeként/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjekor/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiévé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiével/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiétől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiét/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiére/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiénél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiének/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeién/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéiül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéiért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéivé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéivel/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéitől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéit/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéiről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéire/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéinél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéinek/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéin/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéiig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéihez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéiből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéiben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéibe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéi [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiéből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiében/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiébe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeié/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeivé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeivel/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeitől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeit/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeire/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkévé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkével/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkétől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkét/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkére/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkénél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkének/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkén/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéiül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéiért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéivé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéivel/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéitől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéit/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéiről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéire/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéinél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéinek/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéin/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéiig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéihez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéiből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéiben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéibe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéi [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkéből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkében/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkébe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinké/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinktől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkre/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinknél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinknek/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkként/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkké/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkkor/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkkel/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinket/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinken/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinkbe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeink/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeinek/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjein/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiként/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeikor/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeihez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeiben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjeibe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbjei/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbje/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikévé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikével/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikétől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikét/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikére/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikénél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikének/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikén/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéiül/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéiért/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéivé/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéivel/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéitől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéit/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéiről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéire/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéinél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéinek/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéin/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéiig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéihez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéiből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéiben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéibe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéi [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikéből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikében/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikébe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbiké/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbiktől/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikről/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikre/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbiknél/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbiknek/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikké/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikkel/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbiket/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbiken/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikből/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbikbe/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbik/DRT [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbig/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbhez/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebbet/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
SFX G 0 ebben/D [^aeáéiíóőúű]
