hu_hu.dict
verlaine-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt)	ph:verleni
tsz-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
szörnyedt/XBDGV)
seattle-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt)	ph:szietli
poli(vinil-észter)-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
nm3-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
mn.-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
m3-es/Ó×nBGVLR?)
km3-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
ijedt/XBDGV)
gerjedt/XBDGV)
flaubert-es/Ó×nBGVLR)	ph:floberes
epedt/XBDGV)
diner-s/Ó×nBGVLR)	ph:dinés
cayenne-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt)	ph:kajenni
appalache-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt)	ph:epelecsi
üzbégellenes/Ó×nGVËLTtl
ünnepelt/Ó×nGVËLRlą
újszülött/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
ötvenóránkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
ötismeretlenes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
összevert/Ó×nGVËLRlą
örökzöld/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
önzetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
ökonómiai/°BÓŐĐGVËR
óévi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
ítélőképes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
észrevett/Ó×nGVËRlątX
érzékenyített/Ó×nGVËLRlą
értelmi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
érdekes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
élhetetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
ékes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
édes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
átkötött/Ô×ÝGVĚNMRlą
áldozatkész/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
zónaközi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
zeneietlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
víztelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
véres/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
végeérhetetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
vizes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
virágporérzékeny/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
viaszfehér/Ó×nGVËLRlą
veszedelmes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
velencei/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
valamelyes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
ugrifüles/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
tünékeny/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
túlnépesedett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
történelmietlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
tönkrement/Ó×nGVËRlą
tökéletes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
többhetenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
tíznaponkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
térbeni/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
tréfli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
tranzitív/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
tevőleges/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
testvéries/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
természetes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
tenyésztett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
telt/Ó×nGVËRTtą
tehénbőgés/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
sürgős/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
sötétes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
sárgásszürkés/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
szürjektív/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
szövetséges/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
szívtelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
szélvédett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
széchenyis/Ó×nGVËLTtl
századvégi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
szuahéliellenes/Ó×nGVËLTtl
szimpi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
szervetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
szerelmes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
szentséges/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
személyi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
szelídített/Ó×nGVËLRlą
szegényes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
szakszerűtlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
sugárszennyezett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
spanyolellenes/Ó×nGVËLTtl
sokhavi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
shelleyi/BÓŐĐGVËR
sekély/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
rücskös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
részvétlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
régies/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
resztelt/Ó×nGVËLRlą
rendezett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
rejtett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
pépes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
prediktív/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
pipacsvörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
peremtelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
paccer/Ó×nGVËLRlą
névtelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
nádiveréb/Ó×nGVËLRlą
nyolcvanesztendei/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
nevezett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
negyvenórai/°BÓŐĐGVËR
napfényes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
mérsékeletlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
multiplex/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
millióévenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
mesterremek/Ó×nGVËLRlą
megözvegyült/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
megrémült/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
megjelölt/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
maszájellenes/Ó×nGVËLTtl
lépcsőzetes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
link/Ó×nGVËLRą
leplezett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
leges/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
közölhetetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
köves/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
kölcsönös/Ô×ÝGVĚNTtlą
kétkezes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
képviseleti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
kállai/°BÓŐĐGVËR
konzekvens/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
kiégetett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
kiműveletlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
kilencesztendei/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
kielégületlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
kerületi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
kellemetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
karmazsinvörös/Ô×ÝGVĚNMTtlą
jogvédett/Ó×nGVËRlątX
izgi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
inkorrekt/Ó×nGVËLRlą
immungyenge/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
időzített/Ó×nGVËLRlą
hűbéri/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
hév/Ó×nGVËLTtą	
háromhavi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
hitelvi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
hetvenhavi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
havi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
hasüregi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
halványzöldes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
gótellenes/Ó×nGVËLTtl
gyíkféle/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
girhes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
fűtetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
férjezett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
félnaponkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
fröcskölt/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
fineszes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
feneketlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
felkészült/Ô×ÝGVĚNMRlą
fekélyes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
ezüstszürke/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
euklideszi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR	
erőművi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
energiaigényes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
előhasi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
elsőfilmes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
elkülönített/Ó×nGVËLRlą
elbűvölt/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
egyetemes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
döntésképtelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
domborzati/°BÓŐĐGVËR
degresszív/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
csépeletlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
csecsenellenes/Ó×nGVËLTtl
búcsúvétlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
bosnyákellenes/Ó×nGVËLTtl
billióhavi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
beszédes/Ó×nGVËLTtlą
bejelentett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
bajcsy-zsilinszkys/Ó×nGVËLTtl
antropogén/Ó×nGVËLRlą
algyői/BÓŐĐGVËR
Twain-i/BÓŐĐGVËR
XL-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
Szjt.-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
OpenBSD-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
M4-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
IX-es/VÓn×DGTt
GPG-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
DVD-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
BVSC-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
9-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt1)
1000.-es/Ó×nBGVLR1)
